Connecticut, session 2026, HB05426.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than August 1, 2026,
each institution of higher education in the state shall adopt a policy
allowing each student to designate an advisor or support person of such
student's choice to assist and support such student during a disciplinary
proceeding that may result in such student being suspended from such
institution, placed on probation, expelled from such institution or
prohibited from participating in an intercollegiate athletic program at
such institution. Such advisor or support person shall receive copies of
any communication relating to such disciplinary proceeding and
accompany such student to any meeting relating to such disciplinary
proceeding, provided (1) the involvement of such advisor or support
person does not result in the postponement or delay of such meeting as
scheduled, and (2) for disciplinary proceedings concerning sexual
assault, stalking and intimate partner violence, the policies adopted
pursuant to the provisions of section 10a-55m of the general statutes
concerning a student's entitlement to be accompanied by an advisor or
support person shall take precedence over the implementation of the
policy adopted under this section to the extent such policies differ. Each
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5426
institution shall notify every student at the commencement of each
academic year and prior to the commencement of such disciplinary
proceeding of such policy and the manner in which such student may
designate or redesignate such student's choice of advisor or support
person. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an
institution to provide an advisor or support person to a student.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
HED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2